Vermont, session 2025-2026, H917.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Adjutant General * * *
Sec. 1. 2 V.S.A. § 10 is amended to read:
§ 10. ELECTION OF STATE AND JUDICIAL OFFICERS
* * *
(c) At 10 o’clock and 30 minutes, forenoon, on the seventh Thursday of the
second year of the biennial session, the Senate and House of Representatives
shall meet in joint assembly and proceed therein to elect the State officers,
whose election by the Constitution and laws devolves in the first instance upon
them in joint assembly, including the legislative trustees of the Vermont State
Colleges Corporation and the Adjutant and Inspector General. In case election
of all such officers shall not be made on that day, they shall meet in joint
assembly at 10 o’clock and 30 minutes, forenoon, on each succeeding day,
Saturdays and Sundays excepted, and proceed in such election, until all such
officers are elected.
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 2539 is amended to read:
§ 2539. APPLICATION, AWARD, RENEWAL
* * *
(b) On being notified of an eligible applicant’s matriculation at an
institution as specified in subsection 2538(a) of this title, the Adjutant and
VT LEG #389271 v.1

No. 88 Page 2 of 22
2026
Inspector General or the Office of Veterans’ Affairs shall provide funds from
the special fund established in section 2541 of this title to the Vermont Student
Assistance Corporation, which, upon verifying enrollment, shall disburse the
scholarship award to the institution.
* * *
Sec. 3. 16 V.S.A. § 2857 is amended to read:
§ 2857. VERMONT NATIONAL GUARD TUITION BENEFIT PROGRAM
* * *
(e) Termination of tuition benefit.
(1) The Office of the Vermont Adjutant and Inspector General may
terminate the tuition benefit provided an individual under the Program if:
* * *
(3) If an individual is dismissed for academic or disciplinary reasons
from any postsecondary educational institution before receiving tuition
benefits under the Program, the Office of the Adjutant and Inspector General
may make a determination regarding the individual’s eligibility to receive
tuition benefits under the Program.
(f) Adoption of policies, procedures, and guidelines.
(1) VSAC, in consultation with the Office of the Adjutant and Inspector
General, shall adopt policies, procedures, and guidelines necessary to
implement the provisions of this section, which shall include eligibility,
application, and acceptance requirements, proration of service requirements for
VT LEG #389271 v.1

No. 88 Page 3 of 22
2026
academic semesters or attendance periods shorter than one year, data sharing
guidelines, and the criteria for determining “good cause” as used in
subdivisions (d)(2) and (e)(1)(C) of this section.
* * *
Sec. 4. 20 V.S.A. § 361 is amended to read:
§ 361. MILITARY DEPARTMENT; NATIONAL GUARD
(a) The Military Department, created by 3 V.S.A. § 212, shall be
administered by the Adjutant and Inspector General and shall include the
National Guard and all military components of the State.
* * *
(c) The Adjutant and Inspector General shall adopt all necessary rules for
the government of the National Guard pursuant to this chapter.
Sec. 5. 20 V.S.A. § 363 is amended to read:
§ 363. OFFICERS GENERALLY
(a)(1) The General Assembly shall biennially elect an Adjutant and
Inspector General for a term of two years, in accordance with 2 V.S.A. § 10(c).
(2) An Adjutant and Inspector General appointed to fill a vacancy
occurring during a term shall serve the remainder of the unexpired term.
(3) In order to be eligible for election to serve as Adjutant and Inspector
General, an individual shall:
* * *
VT LEG #389271 v.1

No. 88 Page 4 of 22
2026
(b) The Adjutant and Inspector General shall be granted the rank of a major
general within the State.
(c)(1) The Adjutant General may appoint a Deputy with the approval of the
Governor. The Adjutant General may also appoint an Assistant Adjutant
General for Army, an Assistant Adjutant General for Air, an Assistant Adjutant
General for Joint Operations, a Command Sergeant Major, and a Command
Chief Master Sergeant, without pay, with the approval of the Governor.
(2) The Adjutant and Inspector General may remove the appointed
assistant adjutant generals and sergeants and shall be responsible for their acts.
* * *
(4) The Deputy, assistants, and sergeants shall perform duties as the
Adjutant and Inspector General shall direct.
(d)(1) In the absence or disability of the Adjutant and Inspector General,
the Deputy shall perform the duties of that office.
(2) In case a vacancy occurs in the office of Adjutant and Inspector
General, the Deputy shall assume and discharge the duties of the office until
the vacancy is filled.
* * *
(f) All other officers of the National Guard shall be chosen in accordance
with rules adopted by the Adjutant and Inspector General consistent with the
laws of this State and the United States.
VT LEG #389271 v.1

No. 88 Page 5 of 22
2026
Sec. 6. 20 V.S.A. § 365 is amended to read:
§ 365. DISCHARGES TO OFFICERS
Discharges to commissioned officers may be granted by the Governor under
rules adopted by the Adjutant and Inspector General.
Sec. 7. 20 V.S.A. § 369 is amended to read:
§ 369. AWARDS AND MEDALS
Upon the approval of the Governor, the Adjutant and Inspector General
may create and design awards and medals to recognize meritorious service or
outstanding achievement for members of the Vermont National Guard. The
Adjutant and Inspector General shall publish a roster of these awards and
medals, the criteria and process for awarding them, and a description or
specification of each award or medal. All awards and medals shall be
presented in the name of the State of Vermont and be awarded to a member or
retired member of the Vermont National Guard or if the member is deceased to
the member’s spouse, child, parent, sibling, or grandchild or, if none, to a
person designated by the executor of the member’s estate.
Sec. 8. 20 V.S.A. chapter 23 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 23. ADJUTANT AND INSPECTOR GENERAL
* * *
Sec. 9. 20 V.S.A. § 421 is amended to read:
§ 421. DUTIES GENERALLY
VT LEG #389271 v.1

No. 88 Page 6 of 22
2026
The Adjutant and Inspector General shall issue, sign, and transmit the
orders of the Governor, and the rules that may be established, and obey the
orders from him or her the Governor as to carrying into execution the laws of
the United States and of this State. He or she The Adjutant General shall be
charged with the correspondence between the Governor and officers of the
several states and territories, the Secretary of Defense, and other persons in
official stations, on the subject of military affairs, and shall keep a record of
the correspondence.
Sec. 10. 20 V.S.A. § 422 is amended to read:
§ 422. FORMS; RETURN
(a) The Adjutant and Inspector General shall prepare and provide at the
expense of the State, or procure from the federal government, all necessary
rosters and books of record and the blank forms for commissions, discharges,
returns, and other papers required by law. The Adjutant and Inspector General
shall distribute the rosters, books of record, and forms to the officers and
organizations requiring them.
(b) He or she The Adjutant General shall provide an account of the
National Guard and its arms and equipment as required by the federal
government or the Governor and transmit it to the proper officials.
VT LEG #389271 v.1

No. 88 Page 7 of 22
2026
Sec. 11. 20 V.S.A. § 423 is amended to read:
§ 423. EVIDENCE OF NEGLECT OR DEFAULT IN MAKING RETURNS
When the Adjutant and Inspector General is complainant for neglect or
other default in the submission of required reports and other documents, he or
she the Adjutant General shall not be required to be present, but his or her the
Adjutant General’s certificate shall be prima facie evidence that the required
report or document was not properly submitted; and copies of records or
papers in the office, duly certified and authenticated by him or her the Adjutant
General, shall be evidence in all cases as if the originals were produced.
Sec. 12. 20 V.S.A. § 424 is amended to read:
§ 424. PUBLICATION OF LAWS
The Adjutant and Inspector General shall, at the expense of the State,
distribute to and inform every general, field, staff, and commanding officer of
the laws related to the National Guard.
Sec. 13. 20 V.S.A. § 425 is amended to read:
§ 425. RECORDS
The Adjutant and Inspector General shall keep all records required for the
administration of the National Guard.
Sec. 14. 20 V.S.A. § 426 is amended to read:
§ 426. WAR RECORDS AND FILES
Records and files pertaining to all wars in which the State has participated
and rosters of Vermonters participating in wars shall be kept in the office of
VT LEG #389271 v.1

No. 88 Page 8 of 22
2026
the Adjutant and Inspector General or in the State Archives as provided
pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 218.
Sec. 15. 20 V.S.A. § 427 is amended to read:
§ 427. SEXUAL ASSAULT AND HARASSMENT; REPORT
(a) Notwithstanding 2 V.S.A. § 20(d), the Adjutant and Inspector General
shall report to the General Assembly on or before January 15 of each year
regarding complaints of sexual assault and harassment involving members of
the Vermont National Guard.
* * *
Sec. 16. 20 V.S.A. § 428 is amended to read:
§ 428. PROVOST MARSHAL
(a) Appointment; qualifications.
(1) The Adjutant and Inspector General may:
(A) appoint to serve as provost marshal an officer who holds the rank
of major (O-4) or below and is certified as a Level III law enforcement officer
by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council; and
(B) appoint to serve as assistant provost marshal a noncommissioned
officer who holds the rank of first sergeant (E-8) or below and is certified as a
Level III law enforcement officer by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council.
(2) The provost marshal and the assistant provost marshal shall serve at
the pleasure of the Adjutant and Inspector General.
VT LEG #389271 v.1

No. 88 Page 9 of 22
2026
(b) Duties. The provost marshal shall report directly to the Adjutant and
Inspector General and shall have the following duties:
* * *
Sec. 17. 20 V.S.A. § 481 is amended to read:
§ 481. DUTIES GENERALLY
(a) The Adjutant and Inspector General shall keep in good repair, and
attend to the preservation, safekeeping, and cleaning of the ordnance, arms,
accoutrements, ammunition, munitions of war, and implements of every
description, whether the property of the State or issued to the State by the
federal government, and shall have the control and disposition of it for that
purpose, subject to the orders of the Governor.
(b) The Adjutant and Inspector General shall make provisions for the care
and preservation of the buildings and grounds used in connection with the
National Guard.
Sec. 18. 20 V.S.A. § 483 is amended to read:
§ 483. INSTRUCTIONS TO COMMANDING OFFICERS
The Adjutant and Inspector General shall give instructions to the
commanding officers of the separate units of the National Guard as necessary
for the discharge of the duties of the unit and the Military Department under
this chapter.
VT LEG #389271 v.1

No. 88 Page 10 of 22
2026
Sec. 19. 20 V.S.A. § 486 is amended to read:
§ 486. PROVISION FOR PAY
The Adjutant and Inspector General shall provide for the pay of each officer
and enlisted Guard member for duty performed and authorized in accordance
with chapters 21–39 of this title. The Adjutant and Inspector General shall
adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 20. 20 V.S.A. § 541 is amended to read:
§ 541. BOARD OF ARMORY COMMISSIONERS; MEMBERS
The Governor, the Adjutant and Inspector General, and the senior
commander of the Vermont Army National Guard shall, ex officio, constitute
the Board of Armory Commissioners. The Governor shall be the Chair of the
Board and the Adjutant and Inspector General shall be the Secretary.
Sec. 21. 20 V.S.A. § 601 is amended to read:
§ 601. WHEN AND BY WHOM NATIONAL GUARD CALLED OUT
(a) The Governor or, in his or her the Governor’s absence, the Lieutenant
Governor, or, in the absence of both, the Adjutant and Inspector General, in
case of riot, rebellion, or insurrection within the State, or in case of great
opposition to the service of legal process, whether civil or criminal, or in case
of invasion or imminent danger of invasion, or in case of disaster, or
emergency proclaimed by the Governor, may call out the National Guard, or
such parts of the National Guard as he or she deems deemed necessary, and
may order this force into camp for instruction and drill.
VT LEG #389271 v.1

No. 88 Page 11 of 22
2026
* * *
Sec. 22. 20 V.S.A. § 703 is amended to read:
§ 703. DUTIES OF OFFICERS
Commissioned officers shall obey orders received from superior officers;
attend drills, parades, inspections, and reviews prescribed or authorized by this
chapter; make returns pursuant to the direction of the Governor or rules
adopted by the Adjutant and Inspector General; perform other duties incident
to their positions under the Constitution and laws of this State and of the
United States; and conform to rules adopted by the Adjutant and Inspector
General.
Sec. 23. 20 V.S.A. § 704 is amended to read:
§ 704. DUTIES OF ENLISTED MEMBERS
Enlisted members shall obey orders received from their officers to attend
drills, parades, inspections, and reviews directed or authorized by this chapter,
and perform the duties incident to their respective positions, subject to the rules
adopted by the Adjutant and Inspector General.
Sec. 24. 20 V.S.A. § 822 is amended to read:
§ 822. DAMAGED OR DESTROYED PROPERTY
When military arms, stores, uniforms, equipment, or property of any kind
belonging to the State become damaged, partially or wholly unfit for use, or
partially or wholly destroyed, the officer responsible for the property may
VT LEG #389271 v.1

No. 88 Page 12 of 22
2026
request the Adjutant and Inspector General to appoint a board of inspection to
examine and report as to its condition.
Sec. 25. 20 V.S.A. § 823 is amended to read:
§ 823. STORAGE OF PROPERTY
Military stores belonging to the State not issued to the National Guard, and
military property belonging to the United States in possession of the State and
not issued to the National Guard, shall be stored in the State. The Adjutant and
Inspector General shall adopt the necessary rules to secure the safekeeping of
military property issued to the National Guard.
Sec. 26. 20 V.S.A. § 942a is amended to read:
§ 942a. STRUCTURE OF COURTS-MARTIAL
(a) General court-martial. A general court-martial of the Vermont National
Guard shall be convened only by order of the Governor.
* * *
(2) The procedure by which a general court-martial shall function in
view of the State’s lack of manpower, and shortage of places of confinement
and finances, shall be in compliance comply with reasonable rules, adjusted to
the peculiar characteristics of the State. The rules shall be formulated by the
Adjutant and Inspector General, drafted by the Staff Judge Advocate, and
approved by the Governor.
(b) Special court-martial. The Adjutant and Inspector General or the
commanding officer of a battalion or similar unit may appoint a special court-
VT LEG #389271 v.1

No. 88 Page 13 of 22
2026
martial, but the special court-martial may in any case be appointed by superior
authority when the superior authority considers the appointment desirable.
* * *
(d) Appeal from convictions. Any appeal from the sentence of a court-
martial by the defendant shall be taken to the Adjutant and Inspector General.
(1) The defendant shall file written notice of appeal within 30 days after
the court’s finding of guilty.
(2) The Adjutant and Inspector General with the assistance of the Staff
Judge Advocate shall review all questions of law and fact.
(3) The final decision in all appeals from the special and summary
courts-martial are with the Adjutant and Inspector General. An appeal from
the general court-martial conviction shall be reviewed by the Adjutant and
Inspector General as provided in this subsection.
(4) Within 60 days after being served with the written decision of the
Adjutant and Inspector General, affirming in whole or in part the conviction,
the defendant may appeal to the Governor, whose decision is final.
Sec. 27. 20 V.S.A. § 942b is amended to read:
§ 942b. EXPENSES OF MILITARY COURTS
(a) The expense incident to and connected with the holding of military
courts in this State under this chapter shall be paid out of the General Fund
under orders and rules issued by the Adjutant and Inspector General with the
approval of the Governor.
VT LEG #389271 v.1

No. 88 Page 14 of 22
2026
* * *
Sec. 28. 20 V.S.A. § 945 is amended to read:
§ 945. RULES OF THE NATIONAL GUARD
All matters relating to the organization, government, and discipline of the
National Guard, including nonjudicial punishment similar to that provided for
in the Uniform Code of Military Justice, not otherwise provided for by the
laws of the United States, this chapter, or regulations issued by the President
shall be governed by rules adopted by the Adjutant and Inspector General and
approved by the Governor, and the adopted rules shall have the same force and
effect as though enacted in this chapter.
Sec. 29. 20 V.S.A. § 961 is amended to read:
§ 961. COMMANDING OFFICER NONJUDICIAL DISCIPLINE
* * *
(d)(1) The Adjutant and Inspector General or an officer of a general or flag
rank in command may impose:
* * *
(2) The Adjutant and Inspector General or an officer of a general or flag
rank in command may delegate his or her the powers provided under this
subsection to a principal assistant who is a member of the Vermont National
Guard.
* * *
VT LEG #389271 v.1

No. 88 Page 15 of 22
2026
Sec. 30. 20 V.S.A. § 963 is amended to read:
§ 963. NONJUDICIAL DISCIPLINE PANELS
(a) When a service member elects to have his or her the service member’s
case heard before a nonjudicial discipline panel as provided in section 962 of
this subchapter, the panel shall be formed as follows:
* * *
(4) If the nonjudicial discipline is being offered by a general officer, the
panel shall consist of three members appointed by the Adjutant and Inspector
General with the most senior member being the chair and the most junior
member being the recorder, who shall record the summaries of the
proceedings.
* * *
Sec. 31. 20 V.S.A. § 964 is amended to read:
§ 964. APPEALS FROM NONJUDICIAL DISCIPLINE DECISIONS
(a)(1) A service member disciplined under this subchapter who considers
the discipline unjust or disproportionate to the offense may appeal to the next
superior authority within 15 days after the discipline is either announced or
notice of the discipline is sent to the accused, as the commander under section
961 or the appointing authority under section 963 of this subchapter may
determine.
(2) An appeal from the decision of an appointing authority under section
963 of this subchapter shall be taken directly to the next higher authority,
VT LEG #389271 v.1

No. 88 Page 16 of 22
2026
unless the action is initiated by a general officer, in which case the Adjutant
and Inspector General shall have the final decision.
* * *
Sec. 32. 20 V.S.A. § 1483 is amended to read:
§ 1483. ADJUTANT GENERAL; DUTIES AS TO VETERANS’ AFFAIRS
In addition to the duties elsewhere set forth by law, the Adjutant and
Inspector General shall:
(1) acquaint himself or herself become acquainted, and his or her so
shall the Adjutant General’s assistants and employees become acquainted, with
federal, State, and local laws enacted for the benefit of members of the U.S.
Armed Forces and Vermont National Guard, veterans having a discharge other
than dishonorable, and the heirs and beneficiaries of members and veterans;
* * *
Sec. 33. 20 V.S.A. § 1484 is amended to read:
§ 1484. ASSISTANTS; OFFICE SPACE
Subject to the approval of the Governor, the Adjutant and Inspector General
may employ expert and clerical assistants as necessary to administer the
functions and duties of the Adjutant and Inspector General with respect to
veterans’ affairs, and shall fix their compensation within the amounts made
available by appropriation for those functions and duties.
VT LEG #389271 v.1

No. 88 Page 17 of 22
2026
Sec. 34. 20 V.S.A. § 1485 is amended to read:
§ 1485. COOPERATION WITH LOCAL ORGANIZATIONS
The Adjutant and Inspector General may cooperate with local organizations
in the State to provide information and assistance for the purposes set forth in
this chapter.
Sec. 35. 20 V.S.A. § 1486 is amended to read:
§ 1486. ACCEPTANCE OF GIFTS, SERVICES, AND FACILITIES
The Adjutant and Inspector General is authorized to accept gifts, services,
and facilities from any source, public or private, granted in aid of the
administration of the duties of the Adjutant and Inspector General, provided
that no obligation is imposed by the acceptance.
Sec. 36. 20 V.S.A. § 1548 is amended to read:
§ 1548. VERMONT VETERANS’ FUND
(a) There is created a special fund to be known as the Vermont Veterans’
Fund. This Fund shall be administered by the Military Department and shall
be paid out in grants on the recommendations of a nine-member committee
comprising:
(1) the Adjutant and Inspector General or designee;
* * *
Sec. 37. 20 V.S.A. § 1581 is amended to read:
§ 1581. VERMONT VETERANS’ MEMORIAL CEMETERY ADVISORY
BOARD
VT LEG #389271 v.1

No. 88 Page 18 of 22
2026
(a) The Vermont Veterans’ Memorial Cemetery Advisory Board is created
to advise the Adjutant and Inspector General on all matters relating to the
establishment and operation of a Vermont veterans’ memorial cemetery to be
known as the Vermont Veterans’ Memorial Cemetery. The Board shall consist
of:
(1) The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services, who shall
serve as Chair of the Board.
* * *
Sec. 38. 20 V.S.A. § 1601 is amended to read:
§ 1601. AID TO VETERANS IN NEED
(a) The monies annually available for the purposes of this chapter, or the
amount of those monies that is necessary, shall be expended under the
supervision of the Vermont Office of Veterans’ Affairs at the direction of the
Adjutant and Inspector General. The Office of Veterans’ Affairs shall disburse
the funds, as necessary, in aiding, caring for, and educating veterans in need
and persons in need who are legal dependents of veterans. The Office of
Veterans’ Affairs shall award funds to applicants approved for assistance based
on criteria approved by the Adjutant and Inspector General. Monetary
assistance will be given only to applicants who would not be better served by
other State, federal, or private assistance programs. The Adjutant and
Inspector General shall determine conditions for eligibility and shall ensure
that the program is managed to the limit imposed by the available funding.
VT LEG #389271 v.1

No. 88 Page 19 of 22
2026
The Office of Veterans’ Affairs shall submit an annual report to the Adjutant
and Inspector General on all fund activities at the end of each fiscal year. In
addition, the Adjutant and Inspector General shall review all fund expenditures
at least once per fiscal year.
(b) The Office of Veterans’ Affairs shall develop application and operating
procedures for the fund, which must be approved by the Office of the Adjutant
and Inspector General. Any deviation from the application and operating
procedures shall be approved by the Adjutant and Inspector General. The
application and operating procedures shall be available for review by
applicants, service providers, and others that may have an interest in the fund.
Sec. 39. 20 V.S.A. § 1605 is amended to read:
§ 1605. VETERAN EDUCATION
The Office of Veterans’ Affairs may use some, none, or all of the funds to
educate veterans in need about programs and benefits that will provide more
permanent solutions to their financial situation. Any use of funds for veteran
education or program support shall be approved in advance by the Adjutant
and Inspector General.
Sec. 40. [Deleted.]
Sec. 41. [Deleted.]
* * * Hiring Preference for Military Spouses * * *
Sec. 42. 3 V.S.A. § 310 is amended to read:
§ 310. CLASSIFICATION PLAN; RULES
VT LEG #389271 v.1

No. 88 Page 20 of 22
2026
* * *
(f) The Classification and Compensation Plan and the rules for personnel
administration shall be based on merit system principles and shall provide for
compliance with the laws relating to preference granted to qualified persons
who have served in the U.S. Armed Forces and received honorable discharge.
(g)(1) After the requirements of an applicable collective bargaining
agreement have been satisfied with regard to hiring issues and after compliance
with subsection 327(a) of this title, and consistent with applicable State or
federal standards for affirmative action, the State shall make a diligent effort to
recruit, interview, and hire:
(A) those applicants who meet the definition of a veteran as defined
by 38 U.S.C. § 101 and who received an honorable discharge; and
(B) the spouses of veterans, as defined in subdivision (A) of this
subdivision (1), who currently receive disability compensation or improved
pension from the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs and are unable to work
due to disability and the surviving spouses of veterans in cases where the
surviving spouse currently receives dependency indemnity compensation from
the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs; and
(C) the spouses of personnel currently serving in the U.S. Armed
Forces.
(2) Veterans and spouses of personnel currently serving in the U.S.
Armed Forces who apply for and meet the requirements for any open
VT LEG #389271 v.1

No. 88 Page 21 of 22
2026
competitive recruitment that is conducted using a point-based examination and
who receive a passing score shall have five points added to their competitive
examination rating, and service-connected disabled veterans, veterans’
unremarried widows or widowers, and spouses of totally service-connected
disabled veterans who meet the requirements for any open competitive
examination and who receive a passing score shall have ten 10 points added to
their competitive examination rating, subject to the provisions contained in
20 V.S.A. § 1543.
(h) Those individuals qualifying under subdivision (g)(1)(A) of this section
shall be entitled to apply and compete for vacant positions for which
recruitment is being conducted only on a statewide promotional basis.
* * *
* * * Parking for Disabled Veterans * * *
Sec. 43. 24 V.S.A. § 2291 is amended to read:
§ 2291. ENUMERATION OF POWERS
For the purpose of promoting the public health, safety, welfare, and
convenience, a town, city, or incorporated village shall have the following
powers:
* * *
(26) To regulate parking lots and parking meters on public property or
public highways of the municipality, including the power to set parking fees
and use parking revenues for any municipal purpose. Projects relating to
VT LEG #389271 v.1

No. 88 Page 22 of 22
2026
parking lots and parking meters under this subdivision shall constitute an
improvement under chapter 53 of this title, and a municipality shall have the
right of eminent domain to condemn land necessary for such projects subject to
the restrictions set forth in section 2805 of this title and 18 V.S.A. § 5318. A
vehicle with disabled veteran plates issued by any state shall be permitted to
park at a parking meter without fee.
* * *
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 44. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
Date Governor signed bill: April 27, 2026
VT LEG #389271 v.1